California statutes. Financial Code
(a) “Automated teller machine” means any electronic information processing device used by a financial institution and its customers for the primary purpose of executing transactions solely between the financial institution and its customers, if the transactions are not incidental to sales between the customer and a business entity other than a financial institution.

(b) “Branch office” means any office at which core banking business is conducted other than an automated teller machine, a device used to facilitate check guarantee or check authorization, or a remote service facility as defined in subsection (d) of Section 345.12 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(c) “Core banking business” means the business of receiving deposits, paying checks, making loans, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by order or regulation. “Core banking business,” when used to describe the trust business, includes receiving fiduciary assets and administering fiduciary accounts.

(d) “Facility,” means an office at which a bank engages in noncore banking business but at which it does not engage in core banking business.

(e) “Head office” means the office designated by the bank as its headquarters.

(f) “Noncore banking business” means all activities permissible for banks, except core banking business, and except those activities prohibited by law or determined by the commissioner by regulation or order
 not to be noncore banking business.

(g) “Office” means the head office, any branch office, and any facility office of a bank.

(h) “Redesignate offices” means (1) the relocation by a bank of its head office to the site of a branch or facility office in this state and the concurrent establishment by the bank of an office at the former site of the head office, or (2) the relocation by a bank of a branch office to the site of a facility office and the concurrent establishment by the bank of a branch or facility office at the former site of the branch office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 33.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1071.

The commissioner shall issue a certificate in duplicate authorizing a bank to establish and maintain an office. A bank shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for every certificate the commissioner issues pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

Every bank shall establish and maintain a head office which shall be located in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1073.

A bank, with the approval of its board, may establish and maintain one or more offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1074.

A bank, with the approval of its board, may relocate an office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1075.

A bank, with the approval of its board, may redesignate offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

Each time a bank establishes an office, relocates an office, or redesignates an office, the bank shall, within 10 days of the establishment, relocation, or redesignation of the offices, file a notice with the commissioner. The notice shall include:

(a) The type of office or offices to be established, relocated, or redesignated.

(b) The complete address of the
 office or offices to be established, relocated, or redesignated. If an office is being relocated, the old address of the office and the address at which the office will be relocated.

(c) The date the office or offices were established, relocated, or redesignated.

(d) The appropriate fee for the certificate or certificates to be issued by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.

On or before January 1 of each year, every bank shall file with the commissioner a list of all offices that are currently maintained and operated by the bank. The report shall designate the type of each office that is being maintained and operated, and the complete address of each office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1078.

(a) A bank may close or discontinue the operation of any branch office if, before the closing or discontinuance, (1) the bank files with the commissioner a notice containing the information in subdivision (b), and (2) the commissioner within 60 days after the filing of the notice or any longer period to which the bank consents, filing of the notice or any longer period to which the bank consents, either (A) issues a written statement not objecting to the notice, or
 (B) does not issue a written objection to the notice.

(b) (1) A notice filed under subdivision (a) shall contain all of the following information:

(A) The name of the California state bank.

(B) The location of the branch office proposed to be closed or discontinued.

(C) The location of the office to which the business of the branch office proposed to be closed or discontinued is proposed to be transferred.

(D) The proposed date of closing or discontinuance.

(E) A detailed statement of the reasons for the decision to close the branch office.

(F) Statistical or other information in support of the reasons consistent with the institution’s written policy for branch office closings.

(G) Any other information that the commissioner may require.

(2) A notice filed under subdivision (a) shall be in the form, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may require.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a), a notice is deemed to be filed with the commissioner at the time when the complete notice, including any amendments or supplements, containing all the information required by the commissioner, and otherwise complying with subdivision (b), is received by the commissioner.

(d) In determining whether or not to object
 to a notice filed under subdivision (a), except if the commissioner finds that it is necessary in the interests of safety and soundness that the branch office be closed or discontinued, the commissioner shall consider whether the closing or discontinuance of the branch office will have a seriously adverse effect on the public convenience or advantage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1079.

If the commissioner finds for any reason that the establishment, relocation, or redesignation of office would be unsafe or unsound for a bank, the commissioner may order the bank not to establish, relocate, or redesignate offices without the prior approval of the commissioner. The order may contain any other restrictions and conditions as the commissioner deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1080.

If a bank violates any provision of this chapter or fails to comply with any order, the commissioner may levy a penalty against the bank pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 34.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1081.

A bank, with the approval of its board, may discontinue a facility office. Within 10 days of the date of the closure of the facility office, the bank shall file a notice of that discontinuance with the commissioner. The notice shall contain the information required by Section 1076. There shall be no fee associated with the discontinuance of a facility office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1082.

Any bank that establishes a branch office in this state in accordance with Section 36(g)(1)(A) of the National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 36(g)(1)(A)), or Section 18(d)(4)(A)(i) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(d)(4)(A)(i)), as those sections were amended by the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act of 2010, shall, within 10 days of the establishment, relocation, or redesignation of the offices, file a notice with the commissioner that includes
 all of the following:

(a) The name of the bank establishing the branch office or offices.

(b) The home state or state of incorporation of the bank establishing the branch office or offices.

(c) The complete address of the office or offices established or to be established.

(d) The date the branch office or offices were or will be opened.

(e) Any other information, if any, that the commissioner deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1083.

(a) A bank may participate in a financial education program that involves receiving deposits or paying withdrawals on the premises of, or at a facility used by, a school. The school premises or facility will not be considered a branch office of the bank, as that term is defined in Section 1070 of the Financial Code, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The bank does not establish and operate the school premises or facility in which the program is conducted.

(2) Bank employees work at the site only to participate in the program.

(3) The program is provided at the discretion of the school.

(4) The principal purpose of the program is financial education. For example, a program is educational if it is designed to teach students the principles of personal financial management, banking operations, or the benefits of saving for the future, and is not designed for the purpose of profitmaking.

(5) No services are provided to the general public.

(6) The program is conducted in a manner that is consistent with safe and sound banking practices and complies with applicable law.

(b) A bank that participates in a financial education program pursuant to this section shall be liable for all deposits made on the premises of, or at a facility used by, a school as if the deposit was made directly at a branch office of the
 bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Bank Extraordinary Situation Closing [1090. - 1096.]

1090.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the “Bank Extraordinary Situation Closing Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1091.

“Extraordinary situation” means any condition or occurrence, other than as set forth in Section 592, that may interfere or is inconsistent with the conduct of normal business operations at one or more offices of a bank or which poses a threat to the safety or security of persons or property, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

Whenever the commissioner determines that an extraordinary situation exists anywhere in this state the commissioner may, by proclamation, authorize banks located in the affected area or areas to close any or all of their offices. The office or offices so closed shall remain closed until the commissioner proclaims that the extraordinary situation has ended or until such earlier time as the officers of the bank determine that one or more closed offices should reopen and in either event for
 such further time thereafter as may reasonably be required to reopen.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

(a) Whenever the officers of a bank are of the opinion that an extraordinary situation exists which affects or may affect one or more of a bank’s offices, they shall have the authority in the reasonable and proper exercise of their discretion to determine not to open such offices on any business or banking day, or, if such offices have opened to close one or more of them during the continuation of such extraordinary situation even if the commissioner has not issued
 and does not issue a proclamation of extraordinary situation. The office or offices so closed shall remain closed until such time as the officers determine with respect to each such office that the extraordinary situation has ended and for such further time thereafter as may reasonably be required to be reopened; however, in no case shall such office or offices remain closed for more than 48 consecutive hours excluding other legal holidays without requesting the approval of the commissioner nor, in case such request is denied by the commissioner, for more than 24 consecutive hours excluding other legal holidays after such denial.

(b) The officers of a bank may close one or more of the bank’s offices on any day or days designated for mourning, rejoicing, or other special observance by proclamation of the Governor or the President of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

A bank closing an office or offices pursuant to the authority granted under subdivision (a) of Section 1093 shall give prompt notice of its action to the commissioner, by any means available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

Any day on which a bank or any one or more of its offices is closed pursuant to the authorization granted by this chapter shall be, with respect to such bank or any of its offices which are closed, a legal holiday for all purposes with respect to any banking business of any character. No liability, or loss of rights of any kind, on the part of any bank or director, officer, or employee thereof, shall accrue or result by virtue of any closing authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

Provisions of this chapter shall be construed and applied as being in addition to, and not a substitution for, or limitation of, any other law of this state or the United States authorizing the closing of a bank or excusing the delay by a bank in the performance of its duties and obligations because of extraordinary situations or conditions beyond the bank’s control or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Corporate Requirements [1100. - 1190.]



  ARTICLE 1. Articles, Bylaws, and Names [1100. - 1107.]

1100.

The articles of each bank shall contain the applicable one of the following statements:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if the bank is, or is proposed to be, a commercial bank not authorized to engage in trust business, that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in commercial banking business and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or regulations, prohibited to a commercial bank.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if the bank is, or is proposed to be, a commercial bank authorized to engage in trust business, that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in commercial banking business and trust business and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or
 regulations, prohibited to a commercial bank authorized to engage in trust business.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if the bank is, or is proposed to be, an industrial bank not authorized to engage in trust business, that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in industrial banking business and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or regulations, prohibited to an industrial bank.

(d) Except as provided in paragraph (f), if the bank is, or is proposed to be, an industrial bank authorized to engage in trust business, that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in industrial banking business and trust business and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or regulations, prohibited to an industrial bank authorized to engage in trust business.

(e) In case
 the bank is, or is proposed to be, a trust company (other than a commercial bank authorized to engage in trust business), that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in trust business and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or regulations, prohibited to a trust company.

(f) If the bank is, or is proposed to be, a public bank, the articles shall set forth a statement of purpose that is prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 57601 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 7.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Assessment provision” means the provision in the articles of a bank that complies with the requirements of Section 600.2, as in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, or any predecessor statute.

(2) “Bank” means any (A) California state bank or (B) corporation organized under the laws of
 this state for the purpose of transacting business pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21.

(b) On and after the effective date of this section, the assessment provision in the articles of a bank shall no longer be of any force or effect.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 902 and 903 of the Corporations Code, a bank may, on or after the effective date of this section, amend its articles by deleting the assessment provision with the approval of its board alone and without any approval of its outstanding shares.

(d) (1) Any order issued before the effective date of this section by the commissioner pursuant to Section 662, as in effect immediately before the effective date of this section or any predecessor statute, shall, if and to the extent that the bank has not before that
 date levied and collected through sale of shares or otherwise, an assessment on its common shares, be deemed rescinded.

(2) Any proceeding commenced before the effective date of this section by a bank to assess its common shares in accordance with an order issued by the commissioner pursuant to Section 662, as in effect immediately before the effective date of this section or any predecessor statute, shall be terminated on the effective date of this section. On and after the effective date of this section, the bank shall take no further action to levy or collect the assessment on its common shares, and any lien on the common shares created by the assessment shall be deemed extinguished.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

(a) No amendment of the articles of a bank (other than an amendment set forth in an agreement of merger or in a certificate of ownership executed pursuant to Section 1110 of the Corporations Code that requires the approval of the commissioner pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4880) of Division 1.6) shall become effective unless the certificate of amendment or other instrument setting forth the amendment is filed with the Secretary of State with the
 commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. Promptly after the amendment becomes effective, the bank shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of amendment or other instrument certified by the Secretary of State.

(b) Any amendment of the articles of a bank set forth in an agreement of merger or in a certificate of ownership executed pursuant to Section 1110 of the Corporations Code that requires the approval of the commissioner pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4880) of Division 1.6, shall become effective at the time when the merger becomes effective pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.

No restated articles of a bank shall become effective unless the certificate setting forth such restated articles is filed with the Secretary of State with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. Promptly after the restated articles become effective, such bank shall file with the commissioner a copy of such certificate certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.

No certificate of determination of a bank shall become effective unless such certificate of determination is filed with the Secretary of State with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. Promptly after the certificate of determination becomes effective, such bank shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of determination certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1105.

No certificate of correction of a bank shall become effective unless such certificate of correction is filed with the Secretary of State with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. Promptly after the certificate of correction becomes effective, such bank shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of correction certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

No certificate of revocation of a bank shall become effective unless such certificate of revocation is filed with the Secretary of State with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. Promptly after the certificate of revocation becomes effective, such bank shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of revocation certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.

(a) A bank may change its name if it files with the commissioner a report on the proposed change not less than 30 days before the change. The report shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner so requires, be verified in the manner the commissioner may require.

(b) Whenever a bank changes its name, the bank shall surrender to the
 commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority under its old name for its head office, any branch offices, and any places of business. The commissioner shall issue to the bank replacement certificates under the bank’s new name and the bank shall pay to the commissioner a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each replacement certificate.

(c) The commissioner may not deny an application for approval of an amendment of the articles of incorporation of a bank which changes the name of the bank or any other application of a bank relating to a change in the name of the bank because the new name of the bank resembles so closely, as to be likely to cause confusion, the name of any other bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Shares [1120. - 1122.]

1120.

A bank may, with the approval of its board, determine and from time to time redetermine the par value of any class or series of its shares unless its articles provide that such shares shall have par value and specify the par value of such shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

No bank or trust company after October 1, 1949, shall issue any shares before they are fully paid for.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.

No bank shall issue any shares in consideration of:

(a) Services rendered in the organization of such bank; or

(b) Any note (whether or not negotiable and whether or not secured) made by the purchaser of such shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Distributions to Shareholders [1130. - 1135.]

1130.

This article does not apply to any distribution made to the shareholders of a bank in any proceeding to wind up and dissolve or to liquidate such bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1131.

Section 500 of the Corporations Code does not apply to the making by a bank or by any majority-owned subsidiary of a bank of any distribution to the shareholders of such bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.

Neither a bank nor any majority-owned subsidiary of a bank shall make any distribution to the shareholders of such bank in an amount which exceeds the lesser of:

(a) The retained earnings of the bank; or

(b) The net income of the bank for its last three fiscal years, less the amount of any distributions made by the bank or by any majority-owned subsidiary of
 the bank to the shareholders of the bank during such period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1133.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1132, a bank or a majority-owned subsidiary of a bank may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, make a distribution to the shareholders of such bank in an amount not exceeding the greatest of:

(a) The retained earnings of the bank;

(b) The net income of the bank for its last fiscal year; or

(c) The net income of the bank for its current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1134.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1132, a bank may:

(a) With the prior approval of the commissioner, make a distribution to its shareholders by means of redeeming its redeemable shares; and

(b) With the prior approval of its outstanding shares and of the commissioner, otherwise make a distribution to its shareholders in connection with a reduction of
 its contributed capital.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1135.

If the commissioner finds that the shareholders’ equity of a bank is not adequate or that the making by a bank or by any majority-owned subsidiary of a bank of a distribution to the shareholders of the bank would be unsafe or unsound for the bank, the commissioner may order the bank and its majority-owned subsidiaries not to make any distribution to the shareholders of the bank. In addition to the order authorized by this section, the commissioner may levy a civil penalty against the
 bank pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Shareholders’ Equity [1150. - 1152.]

1150.

In determining for purposes of this division whether the shareholders’ equity of a bank or of a proposed bank is adequate, the commissioner shall consider:

(a) The nature and volume of the business of the bank;

(b) The amount, nature, quality, and liquidity of the assets of the bank;

(c) The
 amount and nature of the liabilities (including, but not limited to, any capital notes or debentures and any contingent liabilities) of the bank;

(d) The amount and nature of the fixed charges of the bank;

(e) The history of, and prospects for, the bank to earn and retain income;

(f) The quality of the operations of the bank;

(g) The quality of the management of the bank;

(h) The nature and quality of the ownership of the bank; and

(i) Such other factors as are in the opinion of the commissioner relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.

For purposes of any statute, regulation, or requirement of any governmental official or agency which refers to the capital (including, without limitation, stated capital, paid-in capital, and paid-up capital, but excluding contributed capital), surplus, or undivided profits of a bank, a bank, with the approval of its board, may establish and maintain capital, surplus, and undivided profits accounts and may from time to time allocate and reallocate its shareholders’ equity among such
 accounts; provided, however:

(a) That no part of the contributed capital of the bank shall be allocated to the undivided profits account of the bank;

(b) That the undivided profits account of the bank shall at no time exceed the retained earnings of the bank; and

(c) That, in case the articles of the bank provide that any of the bank’s shares shall have par value and specify the par value of such shares or in case the bank has determined the par value of any of its shares pursuant to Section 1120, the capital account of the bank shall be not less than the aggregate par value of such shares which are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1152.

A bank which has deficit retained earnings may, with the prior approval of its outstanding shares and of the commissioner, readjust its accounts in a quasi-reorganization. Such readjustment may include, without limitation, eliminating such deficit retained earnings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Directors [1170. - 1176.]

1170.

Any reference in this article to the time a notice is given or sent shall be construed in accordance with Section 118 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

The board of a bank or trust company hereafter organized shall consist of not less than 5 nor more than 25 directors, and no bank or trust company shall amend its articles or bylaws so as to reduce the number of directors below five.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

The board of each bank and of each trust company shall hold a meeting not less than once each calendar quarter. Regular meetings of the board shall be held within this state. Any regular or special meeting is valid wherever held if held upon written consent of all members of the board given either before or after the meeting and filed with the secretary of the corporation. Special meetings of the board may be held upon four days’ notice by mail, unless the articles or bylaws provide
 otherwise, or 24 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone or by telegraph, unless the articles or bylaws provide for a shorter period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

The commissioner may, in the name of the people of this state, bring or intervene in an action under Section 709 of the Corporations Code to determine the validity of any election or appointment of any director of a bank to the same extent as a shareholder of such bank might bring such an action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

(a) The commissioner shall be deemed to be a party in interest within the meaning of Section 306 of the Corporations Code with respect to a bank and may, in the name of the people of this state, bring or intervene in an action under Section 306 of the Corporations Code for the appointment of directors of a bank.

(b) The commissioner may, in the name of the people of this state, bring or intervene in an
 action under Section 308 of the Corporations Code for the appointment of a provisional director or directors of a bank to the same extent as a shareholder who held 50 percent of the voting power of such bank might bring such an action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

(a) For purposes of Section 316 of the Corporations Code, to the extent that the making by a bank or by any majority-owned subsidiary of a bank of a distribution to any shareholder of the bank is contrary to any provision of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1130), the making of the distribution shall, to that extent, be deemed to be contrary to the provisions of Section 500 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The commissioner may, in the name of the people of this state, bring or intervene in an action under Section 316 of the Corporations Code for the benefit of a bank against any or all of the directors of the bank or of any majority-owned subsidiary of the bank on account of the making of a distribution to any shareholder of the bank contrary to any provision of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1130) or any provision of Sections 501, 502, and 503 of the Corporations Code, to the same extent as a creditor of the bank who did not consent to the illegal distribution and who had a valid claim against the bank that arose prior to the time of the illegal distribution and exceeded the amount of the illegal distribution, may bring the action in the name of the bank.

(c) As an alternative to the action provided for in subdivision (b), the commissioner may levy a civil penalty against the bank pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

(a) For purposes of Section 316 of the Corporations Code, the making of a loan or guarantee by a bank or any other extending of credit by a bank contrary to any provision of this division shall be deemed to be contrary to Section 315 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The commissioner may, in the name of the people of this state, bring or intervene in an action under Section 316 of the Corporations Code for
 the benefit of a bank against any or all of the directors of the bank on account of the making of a loan or guarantee or any other extending of credit contrary to any provision of this division, to the same extent as a creditor of the bank who did not consent to the illegal making of the loan or guarantee or the other illegal extending of credit and who had a valid claim against the bank which arose prior to the time of the illegal making of the loan or guarantee or the other illegal extending of credit and which exceeded the amount of loss suffered by the bank as a result of the illegal making of the loan or guarantee or the other illegal extending of credit, might bring the action in the name of the bank.

(c) As an alternative to the action provided for in subdivision (b), the commissioner may levy a civil penalty against the bank pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Shareholders [1190. - 1190.]

1190.

(a) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1501 of the Corporations Code does not apply to the annual report of any bank with respect to any transaction consisting of an extension of credit by such bank or by any of its majority-owned subsidiaries.

(b) The annual report of a bank which would, but for the provisions of subdivision (a), be subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1501
 of the Corporations Code, shall disclose such information regarding debts owing to such bank or to any of its majority-owned subsidiaries and transactions consisting of extensions of credit by the bank or by any of its majority-owned subsidiaries, as the commissioner may by regulation require. In issuing any such regulation, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations regarding such matters issued by federal bank regulatory agencies under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Securities [1200. - 1212.]

1200.

Unless the context otherwise requires, in this chapter:

(a) “Offer” or “offer to sell” includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to buy, a security for value.

(b) “Sale” or “sell” includes every contract of sale of, contract to sell, or disposition of, a security for value. “Sale” or “sell” includes any exchange of securities and
 any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities.

(c) “Security” means any stock, capital note, or debenture, or any warrant, right, or option to subscribe to or purchase any of the foregoing.

(d) The terms defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not include any stock dividend payable with respect to common stock of a bank solely (except for any cash or scrip paid for fractional shares) in shares of such common stock, if such bank has no other class of voting stock outstanding, provided that shares issued in any such dividend shall be subject to any conditions previously imposed by the commissioner applicable to the shares with respect to which they are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

No bank organized under the laws of this state shall offer or sell any security issued by it unless the commissioner has issued a permit authorizing such sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

The following transactions are exempt from Section 1201:

(a) (1) Any offer (but not a sale) not involving a public offering by a bank organized under the laws of this state of its securities and the execution and delivery of any agreement for the sale of the securities pursuant to the offer if no part of the consideration for the securities is paid to or received by the bank and none of the securities
 are issued until the sale of the securities is authorized by the commissioner or exempted from authorization.
